Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-619
Farm tractor, defined.

Farm tractor shall mean every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 115.